apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="krōlŏw/ŏ__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏ</l>         <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>õ</l>         <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŏ</l>         <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ymi</l>       <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ŏ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ynka__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ynka</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynki</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynce</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynkã</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynkōm</l>     <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynce</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynko</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ynce</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōnk</l>       <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynkōm</l>     <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynce</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynkami</l>    <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynkach</l>    <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynce</l>      <r>ynka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="prŏwd/a__n">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="swob/oda__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oda</l>       <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ody</l>       <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odzie</l>     <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odã</l>       <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odōm</l>      <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odzie</l>     <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odo</l>       <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ody</l>       <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōd</l>        <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odōm</l>      <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ody</l>       <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odami</l>     <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odach</l>     <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ody</l>       <r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kr/owa__n">
  <e>       <p><l>owa</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owie</l>      <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owã</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owōm</l>      <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owie</l>      <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owo</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōw</l>        <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owōm</l>      <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owami</l>     <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owach</l>     <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owy</l>       <r>owa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="chowa">           <i>ch</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="dōmbrowa">        <i>dōmbr</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="gowa">            <i>g</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="gadzigowa">       <i>gadzig</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="gdowa">           <i>gd</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="krowa">           <i>kr</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="krōlewnŏ">        <i>krōlewn</i><par n="krōlŏw/ŏ__n"/></e>
<e lm="krōlowŏ">         <i>krōlow</i><par n="krōlŏw/ŏ__n"/></e>
<e lm="prŏwda">          <i>prŏwd</i><par n="prŏwd/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="pōnowa">          <i>pōn</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="pōłowa">          <i>pōł</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="rynka">           <i>r</i><par n="r/ynka__n"/></e>
<e lm="sekunda">         <i>sekund</i><par n="prŏwd/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="swoboda">         <i>swob</i><par n="swob/oda__n"/></e>
<e lm="ôsnowa">          <i>ôsn</i><par n="kr/owa__n"/></e>
<e lm="jagoda">          <i>jag</i><par n="swob/oda__n"/></e>
<e lm="ugoda">           <i>ug</i><par n="swob/oda__n"/></e>
<e lm="gospoda">         <i>gosp</i><par n="swob/oda__n"/></e>
